Nebraska, session 109, LB1244.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-382, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-382 (1) The department shall prepare a tax expenditure report
describing (a) the basic provisions of the Nebraska tax laws, (b) the
actual or estimated revenue loss caused by the exemptions, deductions,
exclusions, deferrals, credits, and preferential rates in effect on July
1 of each year and allowed under Nebraska's tax structure and in the
property tax, (c) the actual or estimated revenue loss caused by failure
to impose sales and use tax on services purchased for nonbusiness use,
and (d) the elements which make up the tax base for state and local
income, including income, sales and use, property, and miscellaneous
taxes.
(2) The department shall review the major tax exemptions for which
state general funds are used to reduce the impact of revenue lost due to
a tax expenditure. The report shall indicate an estimate of the amount of
the reduction in revenue resulting from the operation of all tax
expenditures. The report shall list each tax expenditure relating to
sales and use tax under the following categories:
(a) Agriculture, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Agricultural machinery; agricultural chemicals; seeds
sold to commercial producers; water for irrigation and manufacturing;
commercial artificial insemination; mineral oil as dust suppressant;
animal specialty services and veterinary services performed on livestock
as defined in section 54-183 grooming; oxygen for use in aquaculture;
animal life whose products constitute food for human consumption; and
grains;
(b) Business across state lines, which shall include a separate
listing for the following items: Property shipped out-of-state;
fabrication labor for items to be shipped out-of-state; property to be
transported out-of-state; property purchased in other states to be used
in Nebraska; aircraft delivery to an out-of-state resident or business;
-2-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
state reciprocal agreements for industrial machinery; and property taxed
in another state;
(c) Common carrier and logistics, which shall include a separate
listing for the following items: Common Railroad rolling stock and repair
parts and services; common or contract carriers and repair parts and
services; common or contract carrier accessories ; and common or contract
carrier safety equipment;
(d) Consumer goods, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Motor vehicles and motorboat trade-ins; merchandise
trade-ins; certain medical equipment and medicine; newspapers;
laundromats; telefloral deliveries; motor vehicle discounts for the
disabled; and political campaign fundraisers;
(e) Energy, which shall include a separate listing for the following
items: Motor fuels; energy used in industry; energy used in agriculture;
aviation fuel; and minerals, oil, and gas severed from real property;
(f) Food, which shall include a separate listing for the following
items: Food for home consumption; Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program; school lunches; meals sold by hospitals; meals sold by
institutions at a flat rate; food for the elderly, handicapped, and
Supplemental Security Income recipients; and meals sold by churches;
(g) General business, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Component and ingredient parts; manufacturing machinery;
containers; film rentals; molds and dies; syndicated programming;
intercompany sales; intercompany leases; sale of a business or farm
machinery; and transfer of property in a change of business ownership;
(h) Lodging and shelter, which shall include a separate listing for
the following item: Room rentals by certain institutions;
(i) Miscellaneous, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Cash discounts and coupons; separately stated finance
charges; casual sales; lease-to-purchase agreements; and separately
stated taxes;
-3-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
(j) Nonprofits, governments, and exempt entities, which shall
include a separate listing for the following items: Purchases by
political subdivisions of the state; purchases by churches and nonprofit
colleges and medical facilities; purchasing agents for public real estate
construction improvements; contractor as purchasing agent for public
agencies; Nebraska lottery; admissions to school events; sales on Native
American Indian reservations; school-supporting fundraisers; fine art
purchases by a museum; purchases by the Nebraska State Fair Board;
purchases by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and licensees of
the State Racing and Gaming Commission; purchases by the United States
Government; public records; and sales by religious organizations;
(k) Recent sales tax expenditures, which shall include a separate
listing for each sales tax expenditure created by statute or rule and
regulation after July 19, 2012;
(l) Services purchased for nonbusiness use, which shall include a
separate listing for each such service, including, but not limited to,
the following items: Cleaning Motor vehicle cleaning, maintenance, and
repair services; cleaning and repair of clothing; cleaning, maintenance,
and repair of other tangible personal property; maintenance, painting,
and repair of real property; entertainment admissions; hair care and hair
removal services personal care services; lawn care, gardening, and
landscaping services; pet-related services; storage and moving services;
household utilities; other personal services; taxi, limousine, and other
transportation services; legal services; accounting services; veterinary
services; other professional services; and other real estate services;
and
(m) Telecommunications, which shall include a separate listing for
the following items: Prepaid Telecommunications access charges; prepaid
calling arrangements ; conference bridging services; and nonvoice data
services.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in the Tax
-4-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
Expenditure Reporting Act shall cause the valuation or assessment of any
property exempt from taxation on the basis of its use exclusively for
religious, educational, or charitable purposes.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2701.16, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2701.16 (1) Gross receipts means the total amount of the sale or
lease or rental price, as the case may be, of the retail sales of
retailers.
(2) Gross receipts of every person engaged as a public utility
specified in this subsection, as a community antenna television service
operator, or as a satellite service operator or any person involved in
connecting and installing services defined in subdivision (2)(a), (b), or
(d) of this section means:
(a)(i) In the furnishing of telephone communication service, other
than mobile telecommunications service as described in section
77-2703.04, the gross income received from furnishing ancillary services,
except for conference bridging services, and intrastate
telecommunications services, except for value-added, nonvoice data
service.
(ii) In the furnishing of mobile telecommunications service as
described in section 77-2703.04, the gross income received from
furnishing mobile telecommunications service that originates and
terminates in the same state to a customer with a place of primary use in
Nebraska;
(b) In the furnishing of telegraph service, the gross income
received from the furnishing of intrastate telegraph services;
(c)(i) In the furnishing of gas, sewer, water, and electricity
service, other than electricity service to a customer-generator as
defined in section 70-2002, the gross income received from the furnishing
of such services upon billings or statements rendered to consumers for
such utility services.
-5-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
(ii) In the furnishing of electricity service to a customer-
generator as defined in section 70-2002, the net energy use upon billings
or statements rendered to customer-generators for such electricity
service;
(d) In the furnishing of community antenna television service or
satellite service, the gross income received from the furnishing of such
community antenna television service as regulated under sections 18-2201
to 18-2205 or 23-383 to 23-388 or satellite service; and
(e) The gross income received from the provision, installation,
construction, servicing, or removal of property used in conjunction with
the furnishing, installing, or connecting of any public utility services
specified in subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of this section or community
antenna television service or satellite service specified in subdivision
(2)(d) of this section, except when acting as a subcontractor for a
public utility, this subdivision does not apply to the gross income
received by a contractor electing to be treated as a consumer of building
materials under subdivision (2) or (3) of section 77-2701.10 for any such
services performed on the customer's side of the utility demarcation
point. This subdivision also does not apply to:
(i) The gross income received by a political subdivision of the
state, an electric cooperative, or an electric membership association for
the lease or use of, or by a contractor for the construction of or
services provided on, electric generation, transmission, distribution, or
street lighting structures or facilities owned by a political subdivision
of the state, an electric cooperative, or an electric membership
association; or
(ii) The gross income received for the lease or use of towers or
other structures and equipment, including antennas and studio transmitter
link systems, primarily used in conjunction with the furnishing of (A)
Internet access services, (B) agricultural global positioning system
locating services, or (C) over-the-air radio and television broadcasting
-6-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
via radio and television broadcast stations licensed by the Federal
Communications Commission. For purposes of this subdivision, studio
transmitter link system means a radiofrequency apparatus which serves as
a conduit to deliver station programming content from its origin in a
studio to a broadcast transmitter and antenna.
(3) Gross receipts of every person engaged in selling, leasing, or
otherwise providing intellectual or entertainment property means:
(a) In the furnishing of computer software, the gross income
received, including the charges for coding, punching, or otherwise
producing any computer software and the charges for the tapes, disks,
punched cards, or other properties furnished by the seller; and
(b) In the furnishing of videotapes, movie film, satellite
programming, satellite programming service, and satellite television
signal descrambling or decoding devices, the gross income received from
the license, franchise, or other method establishing the charge.
(4) Gross receipts for providing a service means:
(a) The gross income received for building cleaning and maintenance,
pest control, and security;
(b) The gross income received for motor vehicle washing, waxing,
towing, and painting;
(c) The gross income received for computer software training;
(d) The gross income received for installing and applying tangible
personal property if the sale of the property is subject to tax. If any
or all of the charge for installation is free to the customer and is paid
by a third-party service provider to the installer, any tax due on that
part of the activation commission, finder's fee, installation charge, or
similar payment made by the third-party service provider shall be paid
and remitted by the third-party service provider;
(e) The gross income received for services of recreational vehicle
parks;
(f) The gross income received for labor for repair or maintenance
-7-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
services performed with regard to tangible personal property the sale of
which would be subject to sales and use taxes, excluding motor vehicles,
except as otherwise provided in section 77-2704.26 or 77-2704.50;
(g) The gross income received for animal specialty services and
animal grooming services except (i) veterinary services and , (ii)
specialty services or animal grooming services performed on livestock as
defined in section 54-183 , and (iii) animal grooming performed by a
licensed veterinarian or a licensed veterinary technician in conjunction
with medical treatment; and
(h) The gross income received for detective services; .
(i) The gross income received for bail bonding services;
(j) The gross income received for providing chartered flights;
(k) The gross income received for check and debt collection
services;
(l) The gross income received for the cleaning of clothing,
excluding any amounts exempt pursuant to section 77-2704.14;
(m) The gross income received for conference bridging services;
(n) The gross income received for providing credit information;
(o) The gross income received for data processing services;
(p) The gross income received for dating services;
(q) The gross income received for services provided by employment
agencies;
(r) The gross income received for financial reporting services;
(s) The gross income received for fishing and hunting guide
services;
(t) The gross income received for interior design and decorating
services;
(u) The gross income received for interstate telephone and telegraph
services;
(v) The gross income received for investment advising services;
(w) The gross income received for labor to repair intrastate and
-8-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
interstate vessels and railroad rolling stock;
(x) The gross income received for land surveying services;
(y) The gross income received for loan broker fees;
(z) The gross income received for lobbying and consulting services;
(aa) The gross income received for local passenger transportation by
chartered road vehicles, including limousines and similar luxury
vehicles;
(bb) The gross income received for local taxi services;
(cc) The gross income received for mainframe computer access and
processing services;
(dd) The gross income received for motor vehicle cleaning and repair
services;
(ee) The gross income received for nail care services, except for
any such services that are part of a course of medical treatment and are
provided by or under the care or supervision of a licensed health care
practitioner or in a licensed health care facility;
(ff) The gross income received for personal instruction services for
dance, golf, or tennis;
(gg) The gross income received for public relations and management
consulting services;
(hh) The gross income received from purchases by licensees of the
State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(ii) The gross income received for real estate management fees;
(jj) The gross income received for secretarial and court reporting
services;
(kk) The gross income received for seismograph and geophysical
services;
(ll) The gross income received for shoeshine services;
(mm) The gross income received for sightseeing services by ground
vehicles;
(nn) The gross income received for skin care services, except for
-9-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
any such services that are part of a course of medical treatment and are
provided by or under the care or supervision of a licensed health care
practitioner or in a licensed health care facility;
(oo) The gross income received for social escort services;
(pp) The gross income from storage and moving services;
(qq) The gross income received for tattoo and body modification
services, except for any such services that are part of a course of
medical treatment and are provided by or under the care or supervision of
a licensed health care practitioner or in a licensed health care
facility;
(rr) The gross income received for telefloral delivery services
defined as amounts received by florists in this state who make deliveries
in this state pursuant to instructions received from florists in other
states;
(ss) The gross income received for telemarketing services;
(tt) The gross income received for telephone answering services;
(uu) The gross income received for test laboratory services, except
for medical test laboratory services;
(vv) The gross income received for tour operator services;
(ww) The gross income received for travel agency services;
(xx) The gross income received for water well drilling services;
(yy) The gross income received for wedding planning services; and
(zz) The gross income received for weight loss services, except for
any such services that are part of a course of medical treatment and are
provided by or under the care or supervision of a licensed health care
practitioner or in a licensed health care facility.
(5) Gross receipts includes the sale of admissions. When an
admission to an activity or a membership constituting an admission is
combined with the solicitation of a contribution, the portion or the
amount charged representing the fair market price of the admission shall
be considered a retail sale subject to the tax imposed by section
-10-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
77-2703. The organization conducting the activity shall determine the
amount properly attributable to the purchase of the privilege, benefit,
or other consideration in advance, and such amount shall be clearly
indicated on any ticket, receipt, or other evidence issued in connection
with the payment.
(6) Gross receipts includes the sale of live plants incorporated
into real estate except when such incorporation is incidental to the
transfer of an improvement upon real estate or the real estate.
(7) Gross receipts includes the sale of any building materials
annexed to real estate by a person electing to be taxed as a retailer
pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 77-2701.10.
(8) Gross receipts includes the sale of and recharge of prepaid
calling service and prepaid wireless calling service.
(9) Gross receipts includes the retail sale of digital audio works,
digital audiovisual works, digital codes, and digital books delivered
electronically if the products are taxable when delivered on tangible
storage media. A sale includes the transfer of a permanent right of use,
the transfer of a right of use that terminates on some condition, and the
transfer of a right of use conditioned upon the receipt of continued
payments.
(10) Gross receipts includes any receipts from sales of tangible
personal property made over a multivendor marketplace platform that acts
as the intermediary by facilitating sales between a seller and the
purchaser and that, either directly or indirectly through agreements or
arrangements with third parties, collects payment from the purchaser and
transmits payment to the seller.
(11) Gross receipts does not include:
(a) The amount of any rebate granted by a motor vehicle or motorboat
manufacturer or dealer at the time of sale of the motor vehicle or
motorboat, which rebate functions as a discount from the sales price of
the motor vehicle or motorboat; or
-11-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
(b) The price of property or services returned or rejected by
customers when the full sales price is refunded either in cash or credit.
Sec. 3. Section 77-2701.47, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2701.47 (1) Manufacturing machinery and equipment means any
machinery or equipment purchased, leased, or rented by a person engaged
in the business of manufacturing for use in manufacturing, including, but
not limited to:
(a) Machinery or equipment for use in manufacturing to produce,
fabricate, assemble, process, finish, refine, or package tangible
personal property;
(b) Machinery or equipment for use in transporting, conveying,
handling, or storing by the manufacturer the raw materials or components
to be used in manufacturing or the products produced by the manufacturer;
(c) Molds and dies and the materials necessary to create molds and
dies for use in manufacturing that determine the physical characteristics
of the finished product or its packaging material, whether or not such
molds or dies are permanent or temporary in nature, and including any
chemicals, solutions, or catalysts utilized in the mold or die process
even if such items are consumed during the course of the mold or die
process;
(c) (d) Machinery or equipment for use in manufacturing to maintain
the integrity of the product or to maintain unique environmental
conditions required for either the product or the machinery and equipment
used in manufacturing by a manufacturer;
(d) (e) Testing equipment for use in manufacturing to measure the
quality of the finished product;
(e) (f) Computers, software, and related peripheral equipment for
use in manufacturing to guide, control, operate, or measure the
manufacturing process;
(f) (g) Machinery or equipment for use in manufacturing to produce
-12-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
steam, electricity, or chemical catalysts and solutions that are
essential to the manufacturing process even if such produced items are
consumed during the course of the manufacturing process or do not become
necessary or integral parts of the finished product; and
(g) (h) A repair or replacement part or accessory purchased for use
in maintaining, repairing, or refurbishing machinery and equipment used
in manufacturing.
(2) Manufacturing machinery and equipment does not include: Vehicles
required to be registered for operation on the roads and highways of this
state; hand tools; office equipment; and computers, software, and related
peripheral equipment not used in guiding, controlling, operating, or
measuring of the manufacturing process. Machinery or equipment does not
need to come into direct physical contact with any of the raw materials,
components, or products that are part of the manufacturing process to be
considered manufacturing machinery or equipment.
Sec. 4. Section 77-2704.36, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.36 (1) Sales and use tax shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of depreciable : (a) Depreciable
agricultural machinery and equipment purchased, leased, or rented on or
after January 1, 1993, for use in commercial agriculture. ; or
(b) Net wrap, baling wire, and twine purchased for use in commercial
agriculture.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) (a)(i) Agricultural machinery and equipment means tangible
personal property that is used directly in (i) (A) cultivating or
harvesting a crop, (ii) (B) raising or caring for animal life, (iii) (C)
protecting the health and welfare of animal life, including fans,
curtains, and climate control equipment within livestock buildings, or
(iv) (D) collecting or processing an agricultural product on a farm or
ranch, regardless of the degree of attachment to any real property; and
-13-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
(b) (ii) Agricultural machinery and equipment includes, but is not
limited to, header trailers, head haulers, header transports, and seed
tender trailers and excludes any current tractor model as defined in
section 2-2701.01 not permitted for sale in Nebraska pursuant to sections
2-2701 to 2-2711. ;
(b) Baling wire means wire used in the baling of livestock feed or
bedding;
(c) Net wrap means plastic wrap used in the baling of livestock feed
or bedding; and
(d) Twine means a strong string of two or more strands twisted
together used in the baling of livestock feed or bedding.
Sec. 5. Section 77-2716, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2716 (1) The following adjustments to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be made for interest or dividends received:
(a)(i) There shall be subtracted interest or dividends received by
the owner of obligations of the United States and its territories and
possessions or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the
United States to the extent includable in gross income for federal income
tax purposes but exempt from state income taxes under the laws of the
United States; and
(ii) There shall be subtracted interest received by the owner of
obligations of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions or
authorities which are Build America Bonds to the extent includable in
gross income for federal income tax purposes;
(b) There shall be subtracted that portion of the total dividends
and other income received from a regulated investment company which is
attributable to obligations described in subdivision (a) of this
subsection as reported to the recipient by the regulated investment
company;
-14-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
(c) There shall be added interest or dividends received by the owner
of obligations of the District of Columbia, other states of the United
States, or their political subdivisions, authorities, commissions, or
instrumentalities to the extent excluded in the computation of gross
income for federal income tax purposes except that such interest or
dividends shall not be added if received by a corporation which is a
regulated investment company;
(d) There shall be added that portion of the total dividends and
other income received from a regulated investment company which is
attributable to obligations described in subdivision (c) of this
subsection and excluded for federal income tax purposes as reported to
the recipient by the regulated investment company; and
(e)(i) Any amount subtracted under this subsection shall be reduced
by any interest on indebtedness incurred to carry the obligations or
securities described in this subsection or the investment in the
regulated investment company and by any expenses incurred in the
production of interest or dividend income described in this subsection to
the extent that such expenses, including amortizable bond premiums, are
deductible in determining federal taxable income.
(ii) Any amount added under this subsection shall be reduced by any
expenses incurred in the production of such income to the extent
disallowed in the computation of federal taxable income.
(2) There shall be allowed a net operating loss derived from or
connected with Nebraska sources computed under rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the Tax Commissioner consistent, to the extent
possible under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the laws of the
United States. For a resident individual, estate, or trust, the net
operating loss computed on the federal income tax return shall be
adjusted by the modifications contained in this section. For a
nonresident individual, estate, or trust or for a partial-year resident
individual, the net operating loss computed on the federal return shall
-15-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
be adjusted by the modifications contained in this section and any
carryovers or carrybacks shall be limited to the portion of the loss
derived from or connected with Nebraska sources.
(3) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income for
all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, the amount of
any state income tax refund to the extent such refund was deducted under
the Internal Revenue Code, was not allowed in the computation of the tax
due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and is included in federal
adjusted gross income.
(4) Federal adjusted gross income, or, for a fiduciary, federal
taxable income shall be modified to exclude the portion of the income or
loss received from a small business corporation with an election in
effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code or from a limited
liability company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act that is not derived from or connected with Nebraska
sources as determined in section 77-2734.01.
(5) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income or,
for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income dividends
received or deemed to be received from corporations which are not subject
to the Internal Revenue Code.
(6) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income a portion
of the income earned by a corporation subject to the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 that is actually taxed by a foreign country or one of its
political subdivisions at a rate in excess of the maximum federal tax
rate for corporations. The taxpayer may make the computation for each
foreign country or for groups of foreign countries. The portion of the
taxes that may be deducted shall be computed in the following manner:
(a) The amount of federal taxable income from operations within a
foreign taxing jurisdiction shall be reduced by the amount of taxes
actually paid to the foreign jurisdiction that are not deductible solely
because the foreign tax credit was elected on the federal income tax
-16-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
return;
(b) The amount of after-tax income shall be divided by one minus the
maximum tax rate for corporations in the Internal Revenue Code; and
(c) The result of the calculation in subdivision (b) of this
subsection shall be subtracted from the amount of federal taxable income
used in subdivision (a) of this subsection. The result of such
calculation, if greater than zero, shall be subtracted from federal
taxable income.
(7) Federal adjusted gross income shall be modified to exclude any
amount repaid by the taxpayer for which a reduction in federal tax is
allowed under section 1341(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(8)(a) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be reduced, to the extent
included, by income from interest, earnings, and state contributions
received from the Nebraska educational savings plan trust as provided in
sections 77-1415 to 77-1430 and any account established under the
achieving a better life experience program as provided in sections
77-1401 to 77-1409.
(b) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be reduced by any contributions
as a participant in the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, any
contributions to an account established under the achieving a better life
experience program made for the benefit of a beneficiary as provided in
sections 77-1401 to 77-1409, or any contributions to the Give to Enable
Support Cash Fund as provided in the Give to Enable Support Act, to the
extent not deducted for federal income tax purposes, but not to exceed
five thousand dollars per married filing separate return or ten thousand
dollars for any other return. With respect to a qualified rollover within
the meaning of section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code from another
state's plan, any interest, earnings, and state contributions received
from the other state's educational savings plan which is qualified under
-17-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
section 529 of the code shall qualify for the reduction provided in this
subdivision. For contributions by a custodian of a custodial account
including rollovers from another custodial account, the reduction shall
only apply to funds added to the custodial account after January 1, 2014.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced, to the extent included in
the adjusted gross income of an individual, by the amount of any
contribution made by the individual's employer into an account under the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust owned by the individual, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per married filing separate return or ten
thousand dollars for any other return.
(d) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased by:
(i) The amount resulting from the cancellation of a participation
agreement refunded to the taxpayer as a participant in the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust to the extent previously deducted under
subdivision (8)(b) of this section; and
(ii) The amount of any withdrawals by the owner of an account
established under the achieving a better life experience program as
provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409 for nonqualified expenses to the
extent previously deducted under subdivision (8)(b) of this section.
(9)(a) For income tax returns filed after September 10, 2001, for
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2006, under
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be increased by eighty-five percent of any amount of any federal bonus
depreciation received under the federal Job Creation and Worker
Assistance Act of 2002 or the federal Jobs and Growth Tax Act of 2003,
under section 168(k) or section 1400L of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, for assets placed in service after September 10, 2001,
-18-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
and before December 31, 2005.
(b) For a partnership, limited liability company, cooperative,
including any cooperative exempt from income taxes under section 521 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited cooperative
association, subchapter S corporation, or joint venture, the increase
shall be distributed to the partners, members, shareholders, patrons, or
beneficiaries in the same manner as income is distributed for use against
their income tax liabilities.
(c) For a corporation with a unitary business having activity both
inside and outside the state, the increase shall be apportioned to
Nebraska in the same manner as income is apportioned to the state by
section 77-2734.05.
(d) The amount of bonus depreciation added to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income by
this subsection shall be subtracted in a later taxable year. Twenty
percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added back by this
subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2003, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may be
subtracted in the first taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, and twenty percent in each of the next four following taxable
years. Twenty percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added
back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first taxable year
beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent in each of
the next four following taxable years.
(10) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2003, and before January 1, 2006, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased
-19-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
by the amount of any capital investment that is expensed under section
179 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that is in excess
of twenty-five thousand dollars that is allowed under the federal Jobs
and Growth Tax Act of 2003. Twenty percent of the total amount of
expensing added back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed
to begin on or after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first
taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent
in each of the next four following tax years.
(11)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before
January 1, 2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by contributions, up to
two thousand dollars per married filing jointly return or one thousand
dollars for any other return, and any investment earnings made as a
participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the Long-
Term Care Savings Plan Act, to the extent not deducted for federal income
tax purposes.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal
adjusted gross income shall be increased by the withdrawals made as a
participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the act by
a person who is not a qualified individual or for any reason other than
transfer of funds to a spouse, long-term care expenses, long-term care
insurance premiums, or death of the participant, including withdrawals
made by reason of cancellation of the participation agreement, to the
extent previously deducted as a contribution or as investment earnings.
(12) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income for
individuals, estates, and trusts any amount taken as a credit for
franchise tax paid by a financial institution under sections 77-3801 to
77-3807 as allowed by subsection (5) of section 77-2715.07.
(13)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
-20-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced
by the amount received as benefits under the federal Social Security Act
which are included in the federal adjusted gross income if:
(i) For taxpayers filing a married filing joint return, federal
adjusted gross income is fifty-eight thousand dollars or less; or
(ii) For taxpayers filing any other return, federal adjusted gross
income is forty-three thousand dollars or less.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, the Tax Commissioner shall adjust the dollar
amounts provided in subdivisions (13)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section by
the same percentage used to adjust individual income tax brackets under
subsection (3) of section 77-2715.03.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal
adjusted gross income allowed under this subsection or the reduction to
federal adjusted gross income allowed under subsection (14) of this
section, whichever provides the greater reduction.
(14)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by a percentage of the
social security benefits that are received and included in federal
adjusted gross income. The pertinent percentage shall be:
(i) Five percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(ii) Forty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
-21-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
(iii) Sixty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(iv) One hundred percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to
begin on or after January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, social security benefits means
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal
adjusted gross income allowed under this subsection or the reduction to
federal adjusted gross income allowed under subsection (13) of this
section, whichever provides the greater reduction.
(15)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, an individual may make a one-time election
within two calendar years after the date of his or her retirement from
the military to exclude income received as a military retirement benefit
by the individual to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income
and as provided in this subdivision. The individual may elect to exclude
forty percent of his or her military retirement benefit income for seven
consecutive taxable years beginning with the year in which the election
is made or may elect to exclude fifteen percent of his or her military
retirement benefit income for all taxable years beginning with the year
in which he or she turns sixty-seven years of age.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may exclude one hundred percent of the military retirement
benefit income received by such individual to the extent included in
federal adjusted gross income.
-22-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
(c) For purposes of this subsection, military retirement benefit
means retirement benefits that are periodic payments attributable to
service in the uniformed services of the United States for personal
services performed by an individual prior to his or her retirement. The
term includes retirement benefits described in this subdivision that are
reported to the individual on either:
(i) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the United
States Department of Defense; or
(ii) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the
United States Office of Personnel Management.
(16) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount received as
a Segal AmeriCorps Education Award, to the extent such amount is included
in federal adjusted gross income.
(17) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount received by
or on behalf of a firefighter for cancer benefits under the Firefighter
Cancer Benefits Act to the extent included in federal adjusted gross
income.
(18) There shall be subtracted from the federal adjusted gross
income of individuals any amount received by the individual as student
loan repayment assistance under the Teach in Nebraska Today Act, to the
extent such amount is included in federal adjusted gross income.
(19) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2023, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
retired individual who was employed full time as a firefighter or
certified law enforcement officer for at least twenty years and who is at
least sixty years of age as of the end of the taxable year may reduce his
or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount of health insurance
-23-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
premiums paid by such individual during the taxable year, to the extent
such premiums were not already deducted in determining the individual's
federal adjusted gross income.
(20) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the
amounts received as annuities under the Civil Service Retirement System
which were earned for being employed by the federal government, to the
extent such amounts are included in federal adjusted gross income.
(21) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual who is a member of the Nebraska National Guard may exclude one
hundred percent of the income received from any of the following sources
to the extent such income is included in the individual's federal
adjusted gross income:
(a) Serving in a 32 U.S.C. duty status such as members attending
drills, annual training, and military schools and members who are serving
in a 32 U.S.C. active guard reserve or active duty for operational
support duty status;
(b) Employment as a 32 U.S.C. federal dual-status technician with
the Nebraska National Guard; or
(c) Serving in a state active duty status.
(22)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the
amount of interest and principal balance of medical debt discharged under
the Medical Debt Relief Act, to the extent included in such individual's
federal adjusted gross income.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
-24-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
federal taxable income shall be reduced by the amount of contributions
made to the Medical Debt Relief Fund, to the extent not deducted for
federal income tax purposes.
(23) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual who is a qualifying employee as defined in section 77-3108 may
reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount allowed
under section 77-3111.
(24) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced by the amounts allowed to be
deducted pursuant to section 77-27,242.
(25) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any net
capital loss that is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or silver
bullion to the extent such loss is included in federal adjusted gross
income except that such loss shall not be added if the loss is derived
from the sale of bullion as a taxable distribution from any retirement
plan account that holds gold or silver bullion. For the purposes of this
subsection, bullion means coins, bars, ingots, notes, leaf, foil, film,
or commemorative medallions of gold, silver, platinum, or palladium, or a
combination of these, for which the value depends primarily on its
content and not the form has the same meaning as in section 77-2704.66.
(26) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all
taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any
net capital gain that is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or
silver bullion to the extent such gain is included in federal adjusted
gross income except that such gain shall not be subtracted if the gain is
-25-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
derived from the sale of bullion as a taxable distribution from any
retirement plan account that holds gold or silver bullion. For the
purposes of this subsection, bullion means coins, bars, ingots, notes,
leaf, foil, film, or commemorative medallions of gold, silver, platinum,
or palladium, or a combination of these, for which the value depends
primarily on its content and not the form has the same meaning as in
section 77-2704.66.
Sec. 6. Section 77-2912, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2912 There shall be no new applications filed under the Nebraska
Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act after June 30, 2026
December 31, 2030. All applications and all credits pending or approved
before such date shall continue in full force and effect, except that no
credits shall be allocated under section 77-2905, issued under section
77-2906, or used on any tax return or similar filing after December 31,
2035.
Sec. 7. Section 77-3005, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3005 (1) The occupation tax levied and imposed by the Mechanical
Amusement Device Tax Act shall be in addition to any and all taxes or
fees, of any form whatsoever, now imposed by the State of Nebraska upon
the business of operating or distributing mechanical amusement devices,
including sales and use tax on the gross receipts from the operation of
mechanical amusement devices except that payment of the tax and license
fees due and owing on or before the licensing date of each year shall
exempt any such mechanical amusement device from the application of the
sales tax which would or could otherwise be imposed under the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967. Nonpayment of the taxes or fees due and owing on or
before the licensing date of each year shall render the exemption
provided by this section inapplicable, and the particular mechanical
amusement devices shall then be subject to all the provisions of the
-26-

LB1244 LB1244
2026 2026
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, including the penalty provisions pertaining
to the distributor or operator of such mechanical amusement devices.
(2) No political subdivision of the State of Nebraska shall levy or
impose any tax on mechanical amusement devices in addition to the taxes
imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act, except for local
option sales and use taxes.
Sec. 8. Sections 6 and 9 of this act become operative on June 30,
2026. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 10, and 11 of this act become operative
on October 1, 2026. The other sections of this act become operative on
their effective date.
Sec. 9. Original section 77-2912, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 10. Original section 77-2701.47, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, sections 77-382, 77-2704.36, and 77-3005, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 77-2701.16 and 77-2716, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 11. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
77-2704.55, 77-2704.60, and 77-2704.67, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 77-2704.66, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024.
Sec. 12. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-27-